Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-284
Definitions, sections found.

For purposes of sections 46-283 to 46-287, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 46-285 and 46-286 shall be used.

Laws 1980, LB 908, § 2.